apertium-eng-hin.eng.dix
<pardef n="le/ad__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ad</l>        <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ad</l>        <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ads</l>       <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ading</l>     <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">       <p><l>aded</l>      <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">       <p><l>aded</l>      <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="le/ave__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ave</l>       <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ave</l>       <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aves</l>      <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ft</l>        <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ft</l>        <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aving</l>     <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="lo/se__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ses</l>       <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>st</l>        <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>st</l>        <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sing</l>      <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ma/ke__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ke</l>        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ke</l>        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kes</l>       <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>king</l>      <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="me/et__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ets</l>       <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eting</l>     <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="read__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="st/and__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>and</l>       <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>and</l>       <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ands</l>      <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ood</l>       <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ood</l>       <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>anding</l>    <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="occur__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>red</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>red</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ring</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="outbid__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ding</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">       <p><l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">       <p><l>den</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">       <p><l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="r/un__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>un</l>        <r>un<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>un</l>        <r>un<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uns</l>       <r>un<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>un<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>un</l>        <r>un<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unning</l>    <r>un<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e  r="LR">       <p><l>unned</l>        <r>un<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sho/ot__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ot</l>        <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ot</l>        <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ots</l>       <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oting</l>     <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="prov/e__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>en</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="th/ink__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ink</l>       <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ink</l>       <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inks</l>      <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ought</l>     <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ought</l>     <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inking</l>    <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="wr/ite__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ite</l>       <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ite</l>       <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ites</l>      <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ote</l>       <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itten</l>     <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iting</l>     <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="abhor">           <i>abhor</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bar">             <i>bar</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bid">             <i>bid</i><par n="outbid__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="blur">            <i>blur</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="char">            <i>char</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="clutter">         <i>clutter</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="confer">          <i>confer</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="deter">           <i>deter</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="incur">           <i>incur</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="infer">           <i>infer</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="jar">             <i>jar</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lead">            <i>le</i><par n="le/ad__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="leave">           <i>le</i><par n="le/ave__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lose">            <i>lo</i><par n="lo/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="make">            <i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="make a mistake"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>mistake</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>mistake</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="meet">            <i>me</i><par n="me/et__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="misunderstand">   <i>misunderst</i><par n="st/and__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="occur">           <i>occur</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prefer">          <i>prefer</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prove">           <i>prov</i><par n="prov/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="run">             <i>r</i><par n="r/un__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="refer">           <i>refer</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rewrite">         <i>rewr</i><par n="wr/ite__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rid">             <i>rid</i><par n="outbid__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="shed">            <i>shed</i><par n="outbid__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="shoot">           <i>sho</i><par n="sho/ot__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="spread">          <i>spread</i><par n="read__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="spur">            <i>spur</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stand">           <i>st</i><par n="st/and__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stir">            <i>stir</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="think">           <i>th</i><par n="th/ink__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="transfer">        <i>transfer</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="understand">      <i>underst</i><par n="st/and__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="write">           <i>wr</i><par n="wr/ite__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="write about">     <i>wr</i><par n="wr/ite__vblex"/><p><l><b/>about</l><r><j/>about<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
